Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0944.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1510. (1) An insurance premium finance agreement may provide for the payment by the insured of a delinquency charge of $1.00 to a maximum of 5% of the amount of the delinquent installment payment on any installment payment that is in default for a period of 10 days or more. However, an insurance premium finance agreement shall must not provide for the payment by the insured of a delinquency charge that exceeds $5.00 on any installment that is in default for a period of 10 days or more for either of the following: (a) An insurance premium finance agreement that finances an insurance contract primarily for a personal, family, or household purpose. (b) An insurance premium finance agreement, the annual premium of which does not exceed $10,000.00, that is issued to a nonprofit organization exempt from taxation under section 501 of the internal revenue code of 1986, 26 U.S.C. USC 501. (2) If a default under subsection (1) results in the cancellation of any insurance contract listed in the agreement, the agreement may provide for the payment by the insured of a cancellation charge equal to the difference between any delinquency charge imposed in respect to the installment in default and $5.00. (3) A finance company may impose or pass along a fee for an insured making payment by credit card, debit card, electronic funds transfer, electronic check, or other electronic means to offset actual costs incurred by the premium finance company for accepting and processing payments made by electronic means subject to the following: (a) Any fee collected by the premium finance company under this subsection must not exceed the actual costs incurred by the premium finance company. However, the premium finance company may impose a fee instead of the actual cost of the individual payment type that does not exceed the average of the actual cost incurred for the various types of electronic payments for which the premium finance company imposes a fee. (b) The premium finance company charging, collecting, or passing through a fee under this subsection shall notify the insured of the amount of the fee before completing a transaction, provide an opportunity for the insured to cancel the transaction without incurring a fee, and make available the option to make a payment on a loan by check, cash, or money order directly to the premium finance company without the imposition of a fee for a card payment or electronic payment. (c) If an insured elects to make a payment to the premium finance company by credit card, debit card, electronic funds transfer, electronic check, or other electronic means and a fee is imposed and collected under this subsection, the payment of the fee must not be refundable. (d) The fee may be charged in addition to all other interest and fees allowed by law. (e) The premium finance company shall not charge a fee on any debit card or prepaid card transaction if the payment card network on which the transaction is initiated or processed prohibits the fee by contract, rule, or policy. (4) As used in this section, "actual costs" means actual third-party costs incurred or charged for the processing of payments made by electronic means. If a premium finance company is an affiliate of an entity that processes payments made by electronic means, the payment processing affiliate is considered a third party.